California statutes. Financial Code
(f) (1) A person who originates covered loans shall not make or arrange a covered loan unless at the time the loan is consummated, the person reasonably believes the consumer, or consumers, when considered collectively in the case of multiple consumers, will be able to make the scheduled payments to repay the obligation based upon a consideration of their current and expected income, current obligations, employment status, and other financial resources, other than the consumer’s equity in the dwelling that secures repayment of the loan. In the case of a covered loan that is structured to increase to a specific designated rate, stated as a number or formula, at a specific predetermined date not exceeding 37 months from the date of application, this evaluation shall be based upon the fully indexed rate of the loan calculated at the time of application.

The consumer
 shall be presumed to be able to make the scheduled payments to repay the obligation if, at the time the loan is consummated, the consumer’s total monthly debts, including amounts owed under the loan, do not exceed 55 percent of the consumer’s monthly gross income, as verified by the credit application, the consumer’s financial statement, a credit report, financial information provided to the person originating the loan by or on behalf of the consumer, or any other reasonable means.

(2) No presumption of inability to make the scheduled payments to repay the obligation shall arise solely from the fact that at the time the loan is consummated, the consumer’s total monthly debts, including amounts owed under the loan, exceed 55 percent of the consumer’s monthly gross income.

(3) In the case of a stated income loan, the reasonable belief requirement in paragraph (1) shall apply,
 however, for stated income loans that belief may be based on the income stated by the consumer, and other information in the possession of the person originating the loan after the solicitation of all information that the person customarily solicits in connection with loans of this type. A person shall not knowingly or willfully originate a covered loan as a stated income loan with the intent, or effect, of evading the provisions of this subdivision.

(g) A person who originates a covered loan shall not pay a contractor under a home-improvement contract from the proceeds of a covered loan other than by an instrument payable to the consumer or jointly to the consumer and the contractor or, at the election of the consumer, to a third-party escrow agent for the benefit of the contractor in accordance with terms and conditions established in a written escrow agreement signed by the consumer, the person who originates a covered loan, and the
 contractor prior to the disbursement of funds. No payments, other than progress payments for home-improvement work that the consumer certifies is completed, shall be made to an escrow account or jointly to the consumer and the contractor unless the person who originates the loan is presented with a signed and dated completion certificate by the consumer showing that the home-improvement contract was completed to the satisfaction of the consumer.

(h) It is unlawful for a person who originates a covered loan to recommend or encourage a consumer to default on an existing consumer loan or other debt in connection with the solicitation or making of a covered loan that refinances all or any portion of the existing consumer loan or debt.

(i) A covered loan shall not contain a call provision that permits the lender, in its sole discretion, to accelerate the indebtedness. This prohibition
 does not apply if repayment of the loan has been accelerated in accordance with the terms of the loan documents (1) as a result of the consumer’s default, (2) pursuant to a due-on-sale provision, or (3) due to fraud or material misrepresentation by a consumer in connection with the loan or the value of the security for the loan.

(j) A person who originates a covered loan shall not refinance or arrange for the refinancing of a consumer loan such that the new loan is a covered loan that is made for the purpose of refinancing, debt consolidation or cash out, that does not result in an identifiable benefit to the consumer, considering the consumer’s stated purpose for seeking the loan, fees, interest rates, finance charges, and points.

(k) (1) A covered loan shall not be made unless the following disclosure, written in 12-point font or larger, has been provided
 to the consumer no later than three business days prior to signing of the loan documents of the transaction:

CONSUMER CAUTION AND HOME OWNERSHIP COUNSELING NOTICE 

If you obtain this loan, the lender will have a mortgage on your home. You could lose your home, and any money you have put into it, if you do not meet your obligations under the loan.

Mortgage loan rates and closing costs and fees vary based on many other factors, including your particular credit and financial circumstances, your earnings history, the loan-to-value requested, and the type of property that will secure your loan. Higher rates and fees may be justified depending on the individual circumstances of a particular consumer’s application. You should shop around and compare loan rates and fees.

This particular loan may have a higher rate and total points and
 fees than other mortgage loans and is, or may be, subject to the additional disclosure and substantive protections under Division 1.7 (commencing with Section 4970) of the Financial Code. You should consider consulting a qualified independent credit counselor or other experienced financial adviser regarding the rate, fees, and provisions of this mortgage loan before you proceed. For information on contacting a qualified credit counselor, ask your lender or call the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development’s counseling hotline at 1-888-995-HOPE (4673) or go to hud4.my.site.com/housingcounseling/ for a list of HUD-approved housing counseling agencies.

You are not required to complete any loan agreement merely because you have received these disclosures or have signed a loan application.

If you proceed with this mortgage loan, you should also remember that you may face serious financial risks if you use this
 loan to pay off credit card debts and other debts in connection with this transaction and then subsequently incur significant new credit card charges or other debts. If you continue to accumulate debt after this loan is closed and then experience financial difficulties, you could lose your home and any equity you have in it if you do not meet your mortgage loan obligations.

Property taxes and homeowner’s insurance are your responsibility. Not all lenders provide escrow services for these payments. You should ask your lender about these services.

Your payments on existing debts contribute to your credit ratings. You should not accept any advice to ignore your regular payments to your existing creditors. 

(2) It shall be a rebuttable presumption that a licensed person has met its obligation to provide this disclosure if the consumer provides the licensed
 person with a signed acknowledgment of receipt of a copy of the notice set forth in paragraph (1).

(l) (1) A person who originates a covered loan shall not steer, counsel, or direct any prospective consumer to accept a loan product with a risk grade less favorable than the risk grade that the consumer would qualify for based on that person’s then current underwriting guidelines, prudently applied, considering the information available to that person, including the information provided by the consumer.

A person shall not be deemed to have violated this section if the risk grade determination applied to a consumer is reasonably based on the person’s underwriting guidelines if it is an appropriate risk grade category for which the consumer qualifies with the person.

(2) If a broker originates a covered loan, the
 broker shall not steer, counsel, or direct any prospective consumer to accept a loan product at a higher cost than that for which the consumer could qualify based on the loan products offered by the persons with whom the broker regularly does business.

(m) A person who originates a covered loan shall not avoid, or attempt to avoid, the application of this division by doing the following:

(1) Structuring a loan transaction as an open-end credit plan for the purpose of evading this division if the loan would have been a covered loan if the loan had been structured as a closed-end loan.

(2) Dividing any loan transaction into separate parts for the purpose of evading this division.

(3) Committing mortgage fraud, as defined by Section 532f of the Penal
 Code.

(n) A person who originates a covered loan shall not act in a manner, whether specifically prohibited by this section or of a different character, that constitutes fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 517, Sec. 1.   (AB 3108)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Enforcement [4974. - 4979.8.]

4974.

(a) Any compliance failure that was not willful or intentional and resulted from a bona fide error, that occurred notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid those errors, including, but not limited to, those involving clerical, calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and printing errors shall be corrected no later than 45 days after receipt of the complaint or discovery of the error. A person who originates a covered loan shall not be administratively, civilly, or criminally liable for a bona fide
 error corrected pursuant to this section.

(b) If a person who originates covered loans makes a loan where the person knew of and showed reckless disregard for a violation of this division by a broker, the person and broker shall be jointly and severally liable for all damages awarded under this division with respect to the broker’s unlawful conduct.

This section does not impose or transfer liability for a breach of the broker’s fiduciary duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 733, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 733, only to covered loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4975.

(a) (1) Any licensed person who violates any provision of Section 4973, 4979.6, or 4979.7 shall be deemed to have violated that person’s licensing law.

(2) After a knowing and willful violation, the licensing agency may bring a proceeding to suspend the license of the licensed person for not less than six months and not more than three years.

(b) After a knowing and willful violation resulting
 in a second or subsequent administrative or civil action, the licensing agency may bring a proceeding to permanently revoke the license of the licensed person or impose any lesser licensed sanction for at least three years.

(c) A licensing agency may exercise any and all authority and powers available to it under any other provisions of law, to administer and enforce this division including, but not limited to, investigating and examining the licensed person’s books and records, and charging and collecting the reasonable costs for these activities. The licensing agency shall not charge a licensed person twice for the same service. Any civil, criminal, and administrative authority and remedies available to the licensing agency pursuant to its licensing law may be sought and employed in any combination deemed advisable by the licensing agency to enforce the provisions of this division.

(d) Nothing in
 this section shall be construed to impair or impede a licensing agency’s authority under any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 733, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 733, only to covered loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4977.

(a) A licensing agency may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order levy administrative penalties against a person who violates any provision of this division, and the person shall be liable for administrative penalties of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each violation. Except for licensing agencies exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, any hearing shall be held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1
 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the licensing agency shall have all the powers granted under that act.

(b) Any person who willfully and knowingly violates any provision of this division shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the licensing agency in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) Nothing in this section requires exhaustion of administrative remedies prior to an injured party bringing a civil action.

(d) If the licensing agency determines that it is in the public interest, the licensing agency may include, in any action for penalties authorized by subdivision (b), a claim for relief in addition to
 the penalties, including a claim for restitution or disgorgement, and the court shall have jurisdiction to award the additional relief.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impair or impede the Attorney General from representing a licensing agency in bringing an action to enforce this division at the request and on behalf of the licensing agency.

(f) In any action brought by the licensing agency, or the Attorney General acting at the request and on behalf of the licensing agency, under this division in which a judgment against a person is rendered, the licensing agency or the Attorney General shall be entitled to recover costs which, in the discretion of the court, may include an amount representing reasonable attorney’s fees and investigative expenses for services rendered for deposit in the appropriate fund of that licensing agency.

(g) The amounts collected under subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be deposited in the appropriate fund of the licensing agency to be used by that licensing agency, subject to appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of education and enforcement in connection with abusive lending practices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 733, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 733, only to covered loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4978.

(a) A person who fails to comply with the provisions of this division is civilly liable to the consumer in an amount equal to any actual damages suffered by the consumer, plus attorneys fees and costs. For a willful and knowing violation of this division, the person shall be liable to the consumer in the amount of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or the consumers actual damages, whichever is greater, plus attorneys fees and costs.

(b) (1) If a provision
 in a contract in a covered loan violates subdivision (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (i) of Section 4973, Section 4979.6, or Section 4979.7, that provision is unenforceable. A court in which any action is brought by, or on behalf of, an aggrieved consumer for relief may issue an order or injunction to reform the terms of the covered loan to conform to the provisions of this division. 

(2) A court may, in addition to any other remedy, award punitive damages to the consumer upon a finding that such damages are warranted pursuant to Section 3294 of the Civil Code.

(c) Nothing in this section is intended, nor shall be construed, to abrogate existing common law provisions prohibiting double recovery of damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 733, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 733, only to covered loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4978.6.

A person who originates covered loans shall inform any employee, who originates covered loans on behalf of the person, of the administrative or civil penalties for a violation of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 733, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 733, only to covered loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4979.

Upon request, a person who originates a covered loan shall provide the licensing agency or the consumer, at no cost, documentation regarding his or her loan that clearly demonstrates whether any loan is a covered loan. This documentation shall include, but not be limited to, full disclosure of the original principal balance, the annual percentage rate, and the total points and fees, as defined in Section 4970.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 733, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 733, only to covered loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4979.5.

(a) A person who provides brokerage services to a borrower in a covered loan transaction by soliciting lenders or otherwise negotiating a consumer loan secured by real property, is the fiduciary of the consumer, and any violation of the person’s fiduciary duties shall be a violation of this section. A broker who arranges a covered loan owes this fiduciary duty to the consumer regardless of who else the broker may be acting as an agent for in the course of the loan transaction.

(b) Except for a broker or a person who provides brokerage services, no licensed person or subsequent assignee shall have administrative, civil, or criminal liability for a violation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 732, to consumer loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4979.6.

A person who originates a covered loan shall not make a covered loan that finances points and fees in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or 6 percent of the original principal balance, exclusive of points and fees, whichever is greater.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 732, to consumer loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4979.7.

On or after July 1, 2002, a person who originates a consumer loan shall not finance, directly or indirectly, into a consumer loan or finance to the same borrower within 30 days of a consumer loan any credit life, credit disability, credit property, or credit unemployment insurance premiums, or any debt cancellation or suspension agreement fees, provided that credit insurance premiums, debt cancellation, or suspension fees calculated and paid on a monthly basis shall not be considered financed by the person originating the loan. For purposes of this section,
 credit insurance does not include a contract issued by a government agency or private mortgage insurance company to insure the lender against loss caused by a mortgagor’s default.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 733, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 733, only to covered loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4979.8.

The provisions of this division shall not impose liability on an assignee that is a holder in due course. The provisions of this division shall not apply to persons chartered by Congress to engage in secondary mortgage market transactions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.   Applicable, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 732, to consumer loans applied for on or after July 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.8. SECURITIES SALES [4981. - 4983.]

4981.

Any financial institution doing business in this state, or any other person, that sells to the public at any retail branch office at which deposits are accepted, any security which is not a deposit, and which is not insured by an agency or instrumentality of the United States, or a private share insurance or guaranty arrangement, shall provide the customer a disclosure statement as defined in subdivision (a).

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Disclosure statement” means, in addition to any other disclosure required by law,
a disclosure in writing, in accordance with subdivision (b), provided to a customer each time the customer purchases securities from an employee or any other person in a retail branch office.

(2) “Financial institution” means a depository institution, the deposits of which are insured by a federal deposit insurance agency or instrumentality, or a private share insurance or guaranty arrangement, including, but not limited to, banks, savings banks, savings associations, credit unions, and industrial loan companies.

(3) “Security” means any note, stock, treasury stock, bond, debenture, evidence of indebtedness, or any other security within the meaning of Section 25019 of the Corporations Code.

(4) “Public” means individuals and includes members of a credit union. “Public” does not include institutional investors as set
forth in subdivision (i) of Section 25102 of the Corporations Code.

(5) “Retail branch office” means only that part of a financial institution’s premises open to the public for purposes of accepting insured deposits.

(6) “Deposit” includes shares of credit unions and investment certificates of industrial loan companies.

(b) Any disclosure statement provided pursuant to this section shall contain a sentence in at least 10-point bold type to the effect that: “I understand that the product or products I am purchasing or may purchase are not deposits and may not be insured by an agency or instrumentality of the United States such as the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC).” For credit unions, the disclosure statement provided pursuant to this section shall contain a sentence in at least 10-point bold type to the
effect that: “I understand that the product or products I am purchasing or may purchase are not deposits and may not be insured by an agency of the United States such as National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund (NCUSIF), or a private share insurance or guaranty arrangement.” With respect to agreements for the purchase of securities executed by a customer at a retail branch office of the institution which accepts deposits, a customer shall be required to acknowledge in writing that he or she has received and read this statement.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (b), in the case of account relationships opened, or securities sold, by telephone or electronic order, the requirements of this section are met if the disclosure statement is provided at the time the new account documents are sent to the customer.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to
sales of securities or contracts entered into for the purchase of securities prior to January 1, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1545, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4982.

Any violation of this division by a bank is a violation of Division 1.1 (commencing with Section 1000); a violation by a savings association is a violation of Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000); a violation by a credit union is a violation of Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000); and a violation by an industrial loan company is a violation of Division 7 (commencing with Section 18000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 63.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4983.

Nothing in this division shall be construed or interpreted to mean that this division in any way gives a financial institution the authority to offer or sell any type of security that it could not otherwise offer or sell under state or federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1545, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.9. PERSONS CONNECTED WITH FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS [4990. - 4991.]

4990.

(a) Any person convicted of a felony violation of any of the provisions specified in subdivision (b) shall not serve in any capacity as a director or officer or in any other position involving any management duties with a financial institution in this state with accounts insured by an agency or instrumentality of the United States or a private share insurance or guaranty arrangement. This subdivision does not, however, apply to any director or officer of a financial institution, or to persons serving in managerial positions for financial institutions, whose office or employment with a financial institution commenced, and whose felony conviction occurred, prior to January 1, 1991.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to felony convictions of offenses specified in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1320) of Division 1.1, Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 1 of Division 2, Article 8 (commencing with Section 14750) of Chapter 4 of Division 5, and Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 18435) of Division 7. Subdivision (a) also applies to felony convictions of offenses specified in provisions of the laws of the United States added or amended by the federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 (Public Law 101-73).

(c) On and after January 1, 1991, any person who seeks employment by, or a controlling interest in, a financial institution specified in subdivision (a) shall, as a condition to obtaining that employment or
 controlling interest, permit the financial institution, its regulatory agency, or both to have access to that person’s state summary criminal history information, as defined in Section 11105 of the Penal Code, for purposes of determining whether the person has a prior conviction of a felony offense specified in subdivision (b) or any theft offense.

(d) Any state summary criminal history information obtained pursuant to this subdivision shall be kept confidential and no recipient under this subdivision shall disclose the contents other than for the purpose of determining eligibility for employment by, or acquisition of a controlling interest in, a financial institution specified in subdivision (a).

(e) The authority granted by this section to the commissioner and other regulatory
 agencies shall be in addition to any other authority granted by law to obtain information about the background of any person. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any authority of the commissioner or any regulatory agency otherwise provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 334, Sec. 64.   (SB 537)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4991.

(a) In response to a request by another bank, savings association, credit union, or any other financial institution it is not unlawful for a bank, savings association, credit union, or any other financial institution to provide a written employment reference which advises of the applicants’ involvement in a theft, embezzlement, misappropriation, or other defalcation which has been reported to state or federal authorities pursuant to state or federal banking or financial institutions law. In order for the immunity provided in subdivision (b) to apply, a copy of the written employment reference shall be sent concurrently by the financial
institution providing the reference, to the last known address of the person concerning whom the reference is provided.

(b) No bank, savings association, credit union, or any other financial institution shall be civilly liable for providing an employment reference as specified in subdivision (a), unless the information provided is false and the bank, savings association, credit union, or other financial institution providing the false information does so with knowledge and malice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 947, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.10. HIGHER-PRICED MORTGAGE LOANS [4995. - 4995.6.]

4995.

The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this division:

(a) “Higher-priced mortgage loan” has the meaning set forth in Section 1026.35 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) “Licensed person” means a real estate broker licensed under the Real Estate Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 10000) of Division 4 of the Business and Professions Code), a finance lender or broker licensed under the California Financing Law (Division 9 (commencing with Section 22000)), a residential mortgage lender licensed under the California Residential Mortgage Lending Act (Division 20 (commencing with Section 50000)), a commercial or industrial bank organized under the Banking Law (Division 1.1 (commencing with Section
 1000)), a savings association organized under the Savings Association Law (Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000)), and a credit union organized under the California Credit Union Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 14000)).

(c) “Mortgage broker” means a licensed person who provides mortgage brokerage services. For purposes of this division, a licensed person who makes home loans is a “mortgage broker,” and subject to the requirements of this division applicable to mortgage brokers, only with respect to transactions in which the licensed person provides mortgage brokerage services.

(d) “Mortgage brokerage services” means arranging or attempting to arrange, as exclusive agent for the borrower or as dual agent for the borrower and lender, for compensation or in expectation of compensation, paid directly or indirectly, a higher-priced mortgage loan made by an unaffiliated
 third party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 143, Sec. 57.   (SB 251)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4995.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the maximum amount of a prepayment penalty that may be imposed by a licensed person in connection with a higher-priced mortgage loan shall not exceed 2 percent of the principal balance prepaid, for prepayment of the loan during the first 12 months following loan consummation or 1 percent of the principal balance prepaid, for prepayment of the loan during the second 12 months following loan consummation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4995.2.

(a) This division shall apply to any licensed person who in bad faith attempts to avoid the application of this division by doing either of the following:

(1) Dividing any loan transaction into separate parts for the purpose and with the intent of evading the provisions of this division.

(2) Any other subterfuge.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a licensed person shall not make, or cause to be made, any false, deceptive, or misleading statement or representation in connection with a higher-priced mortgage loan.

(c) A mortgage broker who arranges only higher-priced mortgage loans shall disclose that fact to a borrower, both orally and in writing, at the time of initially engaging in mortgage brokerage services with that borrower.

(d) A mortgage broker who provides mortgage brokerage services shall not steer, counsel, or direct a borrower to accept a loan at a higher cost than that for which the borrower could qualify based upon the loans offered by the persons with whom the broker regularly does business.

(e) (1) A mortgage
broker who provides mortgage brokerage services for a borrower shall not receive compensation, including a yield spread premium, fee, commission, or any other compensation, for arranging a higher-priced mortgage loan with a prepayment penalty that exceeds the compensation that the mortgage broker would otherwise receive for arranging that higher-priced mortgage loan without a prepayment penalty.

(2) When providing mortgage brokerage services for a borrower, a mortgage broker shall receive the same compensation for providing those services whether paid by the lender, borrower, or a third party.

(f) No licensed person shall recommend or encourage default on an existing loan or other debt prior to and in connection with the closing or planned closing of a higher-priced mortgage loan that refinances all or any portion of the existing loan or debt.

(g) A licensed person shall not make a higher-priced mortgage loan that contains a provision for negative amortization. This subdivision shall not preclude a licensed person from entering into a subsequent agreement with a borrower to capitalize payments as a means of permitting a borrower to cure or prevent a delinquency.(h) A licensed person who makes a higher-priced mortgage loan and who, when acting in good faith, fails to comply with this section, shall not be liable if the licensed person establishes either of the following:

(1) Within 90 days of the loan closing and prior to the institution of any action against the licensed person under this section, the licensed person did all of the following:

(A) Notified the borrower of the compliance failure.

(B) Tendered appropriate restitution.

(C) Offered, at the
borrower’s option, either to make the higher-priced mortgage loan comply with the requirements of this division or change the terms of the loan in a manner beneficial to the borrower so that the loan will no longer be considered a higher-priced mortgage loan subject to the provisions of this division.

(D) Within a reasonable period of time following the borrower’s election of remedies, took appropriate action based on the borrower’s choice.

(2) (A) The compliance failure was not intentional and resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adopted to avoid those errors, and within 120 days after receipt of a complaint or the discovery of the compliance failure or the licensed person’s receipt of written notice of the compliance failure, the licensed person did all of the following:

(i) Notified the borrower of the compliance failure.

(ii) Tendered
appropriate restitution.

(iii) Offered, at the borrower’s option, either to make the higher-priced mortgage loan comply with the requirements of this division or change the terms of the loan in a manner beneficial to the borrower so that the loan will no longer be considered a higher-priced mortgage loan subject to the provisions of this division.

(iv) Within a reasonable period of time following the borrower’s election of remedies, took appropriate action based on the borrower’s choice.

(B) For purposes of this subdivision, examples of a bona fide error include clerical, calculation, computer malfunction and programming, and printing errors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4995.3.

(a) Any licensed person who violates any provision of this division shall be deemed to have violated that person’s licensing law.

(b) The licensing agency may, by order and after appropriate administrative hearing, prohibit licensees under this division from engaging in acts or practices in connection with higher-priced mortgage loans that the licensing agency finds to be unfair, deceptive, or designed
to evade laws of this state.(c) A violation of Section 2923.1 of the Civil Code in connection with a higher-priced mortgage loan is a violation of this division.

(d) A violation of the provisions of Part 226 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, relating to prepayment penalties in connection with higher-priced mortgage loans, is a violation of this division.

(e) The provisions of this division may be enforced only by the Attorney General or the licensed person’s licensing agency. Any licensed person who willfully and knowingly violates any provision of this division shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation.(f) A prepayment penalty or yield spread premium provision of a higher-priced mortgage loan that violates this division shall be unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4995.4.

The provisions of this division shall apply to higher-priced mortgage loans originated on or after July 1, 2010.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4995.5.

The provisions of this division are severable. If any provision of this division or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4995.6.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to affect any other rights or remedies otherwise available under the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 629, Sec. 4.   (AB 260)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. SAVINGS ASSOCIATION LAW [5000. - 10009.]



CHAPTER 1. Short Title, General Definitions, and General Provisions [5000. - 5330.]



  ARTICLE 1. Short Title [5000. - 5000.]

5000.

This division may be cited as the “Savings Association Law.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Definitions [5100. - 5124.]

5100.

When used in this division, the words and phrases set forth in this article shall have the meanings given in this article unless the context requires another meaning.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.2.

For purposes of this division:

(a) Any reference to regulations of the federal Office of the Comptroller of the Currency or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation shall also be deemed to include and refer to regulations adopted by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board or the Federal Savings and Loan Insurance Corporation, to the extent these regulations have been continued in effect and made enforceable by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency or Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, respectively, pursuant to the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 (Public Law 101-73).

(b) Any reference to charters issued by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency shall also be deemed to include and refer to charters issued by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 277, Sec. 9.   (AB 2907)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5100.5.

“Affiliated person” of a savings association means the following:

(a) A director, officer, or controlling person of the savings association.

(b) A spouse of a director, officer, controlling person of the savings association.

(c) A member of the immediate family of a director, officer, or controlling person of the savings association, who has the same home as that person or who is a director or officer of any subsidiary of the savings association or of any holding
 company affiliate of the savings association.
